apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="f/alle__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>allen</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>allen</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>alle</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>alli</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>alne</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>alne</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>allande</l>	<r>alle<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>all</l><r>alle</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>allast</l>    <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>alle</l>      <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>alli</l>      <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ell</l>       <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/ykke__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>ykt</l>   <r>ykke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykt</l>   <r>ykke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykte</l>  <r>ykke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykte</l>  <r>ykke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykkande</l><r>ykke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>ykk</l>   <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykk</l><r>ykke</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykkast</l><r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykt</l>   <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykker</l> <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>otte</l>  <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykte</l>  <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kip/pe__vblex_adj">
<e r="LR"><p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>pande</l> <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e r="LR"><p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>pe</l>    <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>p</l>     <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>p</l><r>pe</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>past</l>  <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>par</l>   <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>per</l>   <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>pa</l>    <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /verbs -->

<!-- Interjections -->
<pardef n="ja__ij">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Adverbs -->
<pardef n="dagevis__adv">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kva__adv">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="rav/ande__adv">
<e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>ande<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ende</l>      <r>ande<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mog/legvis__adv">
<e>       <p><l>legvis</l>    <r>legvis<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ligvis</l>    <r>legvis<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nem/leg__adv">
<e>       <p><l>leg</l>       <r>leg<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>       <r>leg<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="å__cnjsub">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fordi__cnjsub">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="så__cnjsub">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- OBT wants it this way: -->
<pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="for__cnjcoo">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="både__cnjcoo">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Prepositions -->
<pardef n="i__pr">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ut/anfor__pr">
<e>       <p><l>anfor</l> <r>anfor<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>anføre</l><r>anfor<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>afor</l>  <r>anfor<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aføre</l> <r>anfor<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ut/for__pr">
<e>       <p><l>for</l>          <r>for<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>føre</l>          <r>for<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Adjectives (more in bm.adj.xml) -->
<pardef n="f/å__adj">
<e>       <p><l>ærre</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ærraste</l><r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ærrast</l><r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bak/are__adj">
<e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>arste</l> <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aste</l>  <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>arst</l>  <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ast</l>   <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="slik at">         <i>slik<b/>at</i><par n="fordi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="for å">           <i>for<b/>å</i><par n="fordi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="at">              <i>at</i><par n="fordi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="ettersom">        <i>ettersom</i><par n="fordi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="til">             <i>til</i><par n="fordi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="då">              <i>då</i><par n="fordi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="å">               <i>å</i><par n="å__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="og">              <i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="eller">           <i>eller</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="men">             <i>men</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="enten">           <i>enten</i><par n="både__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="både">            <i>både</i><par n="både__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="korkje">          <i>korkje</i><par n="både__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="verken">          <i>verken</i><par n="både__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="og dessutan"><i>og<b/>dessutan</i><par n="både__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="så">              <i>så</i><par n="for__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="for">             <i>for</i><par n="for__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="at">             <i>at</i><par n="for__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="og at">             <i>og<b/>at</i><par n="for__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ja">      <i>ja</i><par n="ja__ij"/></e>
<e lm="nei">      <i>nei</i><par n="ja__ij"/></e>
<e lm="jo">      <i>jo</i><par n="ja__ij"/></e>
<e lm="bakanfor">         <i>bak</i><par n="ut/anfor__pr"/></e>
<e lm="bortanfor">       <i>bort</i><par n="ut/anfor__pr"/></e>
<e lm="framfor">         <i>fram</i><par n="ut/for__pr"/></e>
<e lm="heganfor">        <i>heg</i><par n="ut/anfor__pr"/></e>
<e lm="hitanfor">        <i>hit</i><par n="ut/anfor__pr"/></e>
<e lm="innfor">          <i>inn</i><par n="ut/for__pr"/></e>
<e lm="nedanfor">        <i>ned</i><par n="ut/anfor__pr"/></e>
<e lm="oppfor">          <i>opp</i><par n="ut/for__pr"/></e>
<e lm="utanfor">         <i>ut</i><par n="ut/anfor__pr"/></e>
<e lm="utfor">           <i>ut</i><par n="ut/for__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sønnafor">        <i>sønna</i><par n="ut/for__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sørafor">         <i>søra</i><par n="ut/for__pr"/></e>
<e lm="austover">        <i>austover</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="omframt">       <i>omframt</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="framantil">       <i>framantil</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="iblant">          <i>iblant</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="nordover">        <i>nordover</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ute">             <i>ute</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="eldande">         <i>eld</i><par n="rav/ande__adv"/></e>
<e lm="exit">            <i>exit</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="knøttande">       <i>knøtt</i><par n="rav/ande__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kva">             <i>kva</i><par n="kva__adv"/></e>
<e lm="medio">           <i>medio</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="moglegvis">       <i>mog</i><par n="mog/legvis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mulegvis">        <i>mu</i><par n="mog/legvis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="naturlegvis">     <i>natur</i><par n="mog/legvis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pinnande">        <i>pinn</i><par n="rav/ande__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sannsynlegvis">   <i>sannsyn</i><par n="mog/legvis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="skrås">           <i>skrås</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="stokkande">       <i>stokk</i><par n="rav/ande__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vanlegvis">       <i>van</i><par n="mog/legvis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="formeleg">        <i>forme</i><par n="nem/leg__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hulter">          <i>hulter</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="listeleg">         <i>liste</i><par n="nem/leg__adv"/></e>
<e lm="styggeleg">       <i>stygge</i><par n="nem/leg__adv"/></e>
<e lm="augesynleg">      <i>augesyn</i><par n="nem/leg__adv"/></e>
<e lm="gnallande">       <i>gnall</i><par n="rav/ande__adv"/></e>
<e lm="avande">          <i>av</i><par n="rav/ande__adv"/></e>
<e lm="jamleg">          <i>jam</i><par n="nem/leg__adv"/></e>
<e lm="flunke">          <i>flunke</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lengst">          <i>lengst</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lukkelegvis">     <i>lukke</i><par n="mog/legvis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lausleg">         <i>laus</i><par n="nem/leg__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tykke">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ykke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="falle">           <i>f</i><par n="f/alle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bønnfalle"><i>bønnf</i><par n="f/alle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="heimfalle"><i>heimf</i><par n="f/alle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kippe"><i>kip</i><par n="kip/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overfalle"><i>overf</i><par n="f/alle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="få">              <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bakare">          <i>bak</i><par n="bak/are__adj"/></e>
